Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-1416
Election, defined.

Election shall mean a primary, general, special, or other election held in this state or a convention or caucus of a political party held in this state to nominate a candidate. Election shall include a vote on a ballot question.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 16;

Laws 1997, LB 49, § 4.